Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.600

Certain first-class districts—Staggered terms.

Any first-class school district having a board of directors of five members as provided in RCW 28A.343.300 and which elects directors for a term of six years under the provisions of RCW 29A.04.340 shall cause the office of at least one director and no more than two directors to be up for election at each regular school district election held hereafter and, except as provided in RCW 28A.343.670, any first-class school district having a board of directors of seven members as provided in RCW 28A.343.300 shall cause the office of two directors and no more than three directors to be up for election at each regular school district election held hereafter.

[ 2009 c 107 s 2; 1990 c 33 s 318; 1969 c 131 s 11; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.336. Prior: 1959 c 268 s 13. Formerly RCW 28A.315.570, 28A.57.336, 28.57.430.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—2009 c 107 ss 1-4: See note following RCW 28A.343.300.

Effective date—2009 c 107: See note following RCW 28A.343.300.